test/src/gt-desc-yamls/N-immeel_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:



  Noun - immeel: # 1B g-v, CCVV > CV
    immeel+N+Sg+Nom: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Gen: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Acc: immeel
    immeel+N+Sg+Ill: iṃelân
    immeel+N+Sg+Loc: iṃelist
    immeel+N+Sg+Com: iṃeláin
    immeel+N+Sg+Abe: immeelttáá
    immeel+N+Ess: imelin
    immeel+N+Par: imelid
    immeel+N+Pl+Nom: imeleh
    immeel+N+Pl+Gen: imelij
    immeel+N+Pl+Acc: imelijd
    immeel+N+Pl+Ill: imeláid
    immeel+N+Pl+Loc: imelijn
    immeel+N+Pl+Com: imelijguin
    immeel+N+Pl+Abe: imelijttáá
